Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.165

Service—Timing.

(1) Unless waived by the nonmoving party, service must be completed on the nonmoving party not less than five judicial days before the hearing date. If service cannot be made, the court shall set a new hearing date and shall either require an additional attempt at obtaining service or permit service by other means authorized in this chapter. The court shall not require more than two attempts at obtaining service before permitting service by other means authorized in this chapter unless the moving party requests additional time to attempt service.

(2) Service is completed on the day the respondent is served personally, on the date of transmission for electronic service, on the 10th calendar day after mailing for service by mail, or on the date of the third publication when publication has been made for three consecutive weeks for service by publication.

(3) If the nonmoving party was served before the hearing, but less than five judicial days before the hearing, it is not necessary to re-serve materials that the nonmoving party already received, but any new notice of hearing and reissued order must be served on the nonmoving party. This additional service may be made by mail as an alternative to other authorized methods of service under this chapter. If done by mail, this additional service is considered completed on the third calendar day after mailing.

(4) Where electronic service was not complete because there was no verification of notice, and service by mail or publication has been authorized, copies must also be sent by electronic means to any known electronic addresses.

[ 2022 c 268 s 11; 2021 c 215 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2022 c 268: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.